Utah statutes.
61-2b-40.   Continuing education requirements.

(1)  As a prerequisite to renewal of a license, certification, or registration, the applicant for renewal shall present evidence satisfactory to the division of having met the continuing education requirements of this section.

(2)  A person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter shall complete during the two-year period immediately preceding the filing of an application for renewal not less than 28 classroom hours of instruction in courses or seminars that have received the approval of the division.

(3)  The division may adopt rules for the implementation of this section to assure that each person renewing that person's license, certification, or registration under this chapter has a working knowledge of current real estate appraisal theories, practices, and techniques that will enable the person to provide competent real estate appraisal services to the members of the public with whom that person deals in a professional relationship under the authority of that person’s license, certificate, or registration.

(4)  An amendment or repeal of a rule adopted by the division under this section does not operate to deprive a person of credit toward renewal of that person’s license, certification, or registration for a course of instruction that is successfully completed by the applicant before the date of the amendment or repeal of the rule.

(5)  In lieu of meeting the requirements set forth in Subsection (2) and applicable rules, an applicant for renewal may satisfy all or part of the continuing education requirements that are imposed by the board in excess of the minimum requirements of the Appraisal Qualification Board by presenting evidence of the following:

(a)  completion of an educational program of study determined by the board to be equivalent, for continuing education purposes, to courses or seminars approved by the board; or

(b)  participation other than as a student in educational processes and programs approved by the board that relate to real property appraisal theory, practices, or techniques including teaching, program development, and preparation of textbooks, monographs, articles, and other instructional materials.

(6)  The board shall develop and propose to the division rules described in Subsection (3).  The rules developed and proposed by the board under this Subsection (6) shall prescribe:

(a)  policies and procedures to be followed in obtaining division approval of courses of instruction and seminars;

(b)  standards, policies, and procedures to be used by the division in evaluating an applicant's claims of equivalency; and

(c)  standards, monitoring methods, and systems for recording attendance to be employed by course and seminar sponsors as a prerequisite to division approval of courses and seminars for credit.

(7) (a)  A person whose license, certification, or registration is revoked or suspended as the result of a disciplinary action taken by the board may not apply for reinstatement unless the person presents evidence of completion of the continuing education requirement that is required by this chapter for renewal.

(b)  The continuing education required under Subsection (7)(a) may not be imposed upon an applicant for reinstatement who has been required by the division to successfully complete the examination for licensure or certification required by Section 61-2b-20 as a condition to reinstatement.

